District of Columbia statutes.
38-2305

Repealed

Successor to Columbia Institution for the Deaf.

Repealed.

June 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 265, ch. 324, § 1
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410
1973 Ed., § 31-1025.
1981 Ed., § 31-1805.